Illinois, session 104th, HB3804.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 143.5 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/143.5 new)7    Sec. 143.5. Policy readability.8    (a) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 9of the 104th General Assembly, a policy issued, amended, 10renewed, or delivered by an insurance company authorized to do 11business in this State shall be written in language easily 12readable and understandable by a person of average 13intelligence and education. 14    (b) In determining whether a policy is readable within the 15meaning of this Section, the Director shall consider, at 16least, the following factors: 17        (1) the simplicity of the sentence structure and the 18    shortness of the sentences used; 19        (2) the extent to which commonly used and understood 20    words are employed; 21        (3) the extent to which legal terms are avoided; 22        (4) the extent to which references to other sections 23    or provisions of the contract are minimized;   HB3804- 2 -LRB104 12274 JDS 22386 b1        (5) the extent to which definitional provisions are 2    incorporated in the text of the policy or contract; and 3        (6) any additional factors relevant to the readability 4    or understandability of an insurance policy or contract 5    that the Director may prescribe by rule.